Mississippi, session 2026, SB2617.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  Section 63-3-519, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 63-3-519. * * *  It shall be unlawful for any person or peace officer or law enforcement agency, except the Mississippi Highway Safety Patrol,  (1)  Only the following listed peace officers and law enforcement agencies are permitted to purchase or use or allow to be used any type of radar speed detection equipment upon any public street, road or highway of this state * * *.  However, such equipment may be used: (a)  The Mississippi Highway Safety Patrol; ( * * *ab) * * *  By Municipal law enforcement officers within a municipality having a population of two thousand (2,000) or more, according to the latest or a previous federal census, upon the public streets of the municipality, but in no case where the latest federal census population for the municipality is less than one thousand five hundred (1,500); ( * * *bc) * * *  By  Any college or university campus police force within the confines of any campus * * * wherein at which more than two thousand (2,000) students are enrolled; ( * * *cd) * * *  By  Municipal law enforcement officers in any municipality having a population in excess of fifteen thousand (15,000) according to the latest federal decennial census on federally designated highways lying within the corporate limits * * *.; ( * * *de) * * *  By Municipal law enforcement officers upon the public streets of any incorporated municipality (i) where the county seat is located in the municipality and (ii) where there is a public community college located in the municipality * * *.; and (f)  The sheriff and sheriff deputies on any public road, street or highway that is located no less than one thousand (1,000) feet outside the jurisdictional limits of any municipality, hamlet or village. (2)  The Mississippi Highway Safety Patrol shall be immediately notified by municipal law enforcement of any road blockages or emergencies occurring on any federally designated limited-access highways lying within the corporate limits. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.